Washington statutes.
RCW 36.33.100

Investment in warrants on tax refund fund—Purchased warrants as cash.

In making settlements of accounts between outgoing and incoming county treasurers, any county tax refund warrant in which money in the county current expense fund has been invested shall be deemed in every way the equivalent of cash and shall be receipted for by the incoming county treasurer as such.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.33.100. Prior: 1943 c 61 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 5545-13.]